Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Article 1. In General

§ 36-1-101.
Definitions.

Unless the context indicates otherwise, as used in this act:

The term “board” shall mean the board of land commissioners;

The term “director” means the director of the office of state lands and investments;

The term “state” shall mean the state of Wyoming;

The terms “state lands”, “land” or “lands” shall mean and include all lands under the jurisdiction of the board of land commissioners;

The terms “school land” or “school lands” shall mean and include all lands granted to the state of Wyoming by the United States of America for the benefit and support of public schools, either directly or through exchange for other lands;

The term “institutional lands” shall mean state lands selected for the benefit of state institutions or any lands other than school lands;

The term “old lessee” means the person, firm, association or corporation in whose name the expiring lease appeared of record in the office of state lands and investments at the time of its expiration;

“This act” means W.S.

36-1-101

through

36-3-111

,

36-5-101

through

36-7-510

and

36-9-101

through

36-9-120

.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 108, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 91-101; C.S. 1945, § 24-101; W.S. 1957, § 36-1; Laws 1992, ch. 55, § 3; 1998, ch. 13, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 36-1-102.
Recording and filing documents of title.

Every department, institution, board and commission of the state of Wyoming which now has or shall hereafter acquire an interest in real property, except leases, easements and rights-of-way for a term not exceeding three (3) years, shall record the document of title with the appropriate county clerk, unless previously recorded, and after recording, shall file the original document with the director excepting, however, easement and right-of-way conveyances previously obtained by the state department of transportation or state transportation commission. This section shall have no effect on existing recording statutes.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 140, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 36-1.1; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1992, ch. 55, § 3.

§ 36-1-103.
Computation of time after registered notice.

When the provisions of this act or the rules and regulations of the board require registered notice to be given, the time shall be reckoned from the date of delivery of such notice by the United States post office, or in the event of nondelivery thereof, from the date of the return thereof to the board by the United States post office.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 108, § 19; R.S. 1931, § 91-119; C.S. 1945, § 24-120; W.S. 1957, § 36-2.

Cross references. —

For civil rule as to computation of time, see Rule 6, W.R.C.P.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 36-1-101(a)(viii).

§ 36-1-104.
Acceptance of school lands.

Under the provisions of article 18 of the constitution of the state of Wyoming, the state of Wyoming hereby accepts the lands granted to it by the act of congress entitled “An act to provide for the admission of the state of Wyoming into the union, and for other purposes”, approved July 10, 1890 [26 Statutes at Large 222, Ch. 664], for the purposes in the said act specified; and hereby accepts the grant of numbered school sections mineral in character as made by the act of congress entitled “An act confirming in states and territories title to lands granted by the United States of America in aid of common or public schools”, approved January 25, 1927 [43 U.S.C. §§ 870, 871], subject to the provisions and conditions of the said act, and the said lands so granted by the United States of America to the state of Wyoming are hereby solemnly set apart to the purposes specified in the said acts.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 108, § 6; 1931, ch. 40, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 91-106; C.S. 1945, § 24-106; W.S. 1957, § 36-3.

Cross references. —

As to terms of payment for school and state lands sold, see §

36-9-107

.

Cited

in

Mayor v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 64 Wyo. 409, 192 P.2d 403,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1948).

§ 36-1-105.
Exchange of land granted by federal government.

Whenever, in the judgment of a majority of the members of the board, the interests of the state will be advanced by granting, conveying or deeding to the United States of America, any lands which have been heretofore granted, selected by, and patented to the state, then, in such case said board is hereby authorized and empowered to so grant, convey and deed to the United States of America, such lands. And the president of said board, and the director are authorized and empowered to execute and deliver all necessary instruments to complete such grant, or conveyance; provided, always, that no such lands shall be so granted, conveyed and deeded, unless the United States of America shall, and will permit and allow this state to select, and have patented to it, an equal area of other lands in lieu of the lands so reconveyed to the United States of America; provided, however, that the state shall not give both surface and mineral rights with any lands exchanged unless it receives the same from the federal government.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 108, § 22; R.S. 1931, § 91-122; C.S. 1945, § 24-123; W.S. 1957, § 36-4; Laws 1992, ch. 55, § 3.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming School Trust Lands Trapped Inside Grand Teton National Park — Alternative Solutions for the Commissioner of Public Lands,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 207 (1985).

§ 36-1-106.
Exchange of state-owned and federal-owned lands.

The state of Wyoming, in accordance with the provisions of the Taylor Grazing Act [43 U.S.C. § 315 et seq.] and other acts of congress authorizing the exchange of federal-owned lands, is hereby authorized and empowered to exchange state-owned lands for federal-owned lands.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 76, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 24-126; Laws 1955, ch. 30, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 36-5.

Cross references. —

As to Taylor Grazing Act funds, see §

9-4-401

et seq.

§ 36-1-107.
Exchange of state-owned and privately owned lands.

The state of Wyoming is also authorized to exchange state-owned lands for privately owned lands.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 76, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 24-127; W.S. 1957, § 36-6.

Cross references. —

As to sale of state lands, see chapter 9 of this title.

§ 36-1-108.
Pole Mountain district of Medicine Bow national forest; history and relinquishment of legislative jurisdiction by federal government.

By W.S.

19-7-301

, the legislature of the state of Wyoming ceded exclusive jurisdiction to what was then known as Fort Francis E. Warren, now referred to as Warren Air Force Base and at the same time, exclusive jurisdiction was extended to future additions to such post. The Pole Mountain district of the Medicine Bow national forest was set aside for military purposes by Executive Order No. 4245, dated June 5, 1925, as amended by Public Land Order No. 1897, dated July 10, 1959. Use for military purposes terminated in accordance with Public Land Order No. 2446, dated July 20, 1961.

By the act of August 27, 1964 (Public Law 88-494, 78 Stat. 611) the secretary of agriculture was authorized to relinquish to the state of Wyoming such measure of legislative jurisdiction as he deemed desirable over such lands. On December 24, 1964, Orville L. Freeman, secretary of the department of agriculture, United States of America, notified the governor of the state of Wyoming that the United States relinquishes and retrocedes to the state of Wyoming any and all legislative jurisdiction heretofore acquired by the United States over lands within the Medicine Bow national forest constituting the area known as the Pole Mountain district, created as above stated, to take effect upon acceptance of such jurisdiction by the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 182, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 36-6.1; 1998, ch. 99, § 2.

§ 36-1-109.
Pole Mountain district of Medicine Bow national forest; acceptance by state.

The state of Wyoming hereby accepts legislative jurisdiction over the Pole Mountain district of the Medicine Bow national forest.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 182, § 2; W.S. 1957 § 36-6.2.

§ 36-1-110.
Authority of director to effect and complete exchanges.

The director is hereby authorized and empowered, subject to the approval of the state board of land commissioners, to effect and complete such exchange of state-owned lands for federal-owned lands; and also to effect and complete such exchange of state-owned lands for privately owned lands; and to do any and all things necessary or required to be done by the state of Wyoming in order to enable said state to comply with the provisions of said Taylor Grazing Act and other acts of congress authorizing the exchange of federal-owned lands, and any order, rule or regulation passed or promulgated in pursuance thereof; and to effect and complete the exchange of state-owned lands for privately-owned lands. The board of land commissioners may authorize the purchase of lands only in an amount necessary to effect and complete the exchange of state-owned lands for other lands and only for those lands identified in the authorization of purchase. The board shall not use the power of eminent domain pursuant to W.S.

1-26-801

et seq. to purchase any lands under this section.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 76, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 24-128; Laws 1955, ch. 30, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 36-7; Laws 1992, ch. 55, § 3; 1999, ch. 87, § 1.

Taylor Grazing Act. —

The federal Taylor Grazing Act, referred to in this section, appears as 43 U.S.C. § 315 et seq.

§ 36-1-111.
Orders, rules and regulations relative to exchange of lands.

The board of land commissioners is hereby authorized and empowered to pass and promulgate all such orders, rules and regulations as may be necessary or required relative to the appraisal and valuation of the lands to be exchanged as provided in this act, and to provide for the execution of conveyances, contracts and other instruments pertaining to the exchange of the lands, and to enable the director to effect and complete each exchange of the lands. The board may authorize the purchase of lands only in an amount necessary to effect and complete the exchange of state-owned lands for other lands and only for those lands identified in the authorization of purchase. The board shall not use the power of eminent domain pursuant to W.S.

1-26-801

et seq. to purchase any lands under this section. The board of land commissioners is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the exchange of state lands on a value for value basis. The exchange program may authorize a cash equalization receipt or payment of up to twenty-five percent (25%) of the value of the lands exchanged. Any receipt shall be deposited into, and any payment shall be made from, the permanent land fund. State lands may be exchanged upon the board’s finding the exchange is necessary to:

Make state lands more manageable where the lands are not otherwise manageable;

Meet a specific need of a school or community for land;

Better meet the multiple use objectives for the benefit of the trust; or

Realize a clear long term benefit to the trust which substantially exceeds the present and probable future benefit from continued ownership.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 76, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 24-129; W.S. 1957, § 36-8; Laws 1992, ch. 55, § 3; 1997, ch. 200, § 1; 1999, ch. 87, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 36-1-101(a)(viii).

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1935, ch. 76, § 5, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

§ 36-1-112.
Cutting of timber by lessee of state lands prohibited; general penalty for violations; damages.

The lessee of state lands shall in no case be allowed to cut or use more timber therefrom, than shall be necessary for the improvement of such lands, or for fuel for the use of the family of the lessee. The director may, in his discretion and subject to criteria established by the board, sell and dispose of timber located or growing on state lands, at not less than the reasonable market value thereof.

Removal of forest products from state lands is permitted only under a valid contract or small sale permit. Any person who knowingly or with reckless disregard removes forest products from state lands without proper authorization is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both. In addition to these penalties, a person removing forest products from state lands without proper authorization is liable for damages up to the amount of three (3) times the bid value of the most recent auction of similar species and product, or the appraised value whichever is greater, plus actual restoration and administrative costs.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 108, § 23; R.S. 1931, § 91-123; C.S. 1945, § 24-124; W.S. 1957, § 36-9; 1997, ch. 200, § 1; 2006, ch. 95, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to disposal of slashings and debris on timber lands, see §

36-3-109

.

As to driving or floating logs, timber or lumber on streams, see §

41-5-108

.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, rewrote (b), deleting designations (i) and (ii) regarding settlement negotiation provisions and inserting penalty and fees for removal of forest products from state land without authorization.

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1929, ch. 108, § 25, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Constitutionality of reforestation or forest conservation legislation, 13 ALR2d 1095.

§ 36-1-113.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 200, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1897, ch. 77, § 1, related to a conditional right to cut and use timber from public lands.

§ 36-1-114.
Protection of prehistoric ruins; permits to excavate, regulations and violations.

Before any excavation on any prehistoric ruins, pictographs, hieroglyphics, or any other ancient markings, or writing or archaeological and paleontological deposits in the state of Wyoming on any state or federal lands, shall be undertaken, a permit shall first be obtained from the state board of land commissioners. The state board of land commissioners is hereby authorized to promulgate and enforce such regulations as it may deem needful to protect from vandalism or injury the prehistoric ruins, relics, archaeological and paleontological deposits of the state, as well as all natural bridges and natural scenic features and formations. Any violation of such regulations shall be a misdemeanor.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 37, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 24-131; W.S. 1957, § 36-11; 2007, ch. 33, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “state or federal” for “public” and deleted “either state or federal.”

Law reviews. —

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Application and construction of § 106 of the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966 (16 U.S.C. § 470f), dealing with federally sponsored projects which affect historic properties, 68 ALR Fed 578.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
176.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 36-1-115.
Protection of prehistoric ruins; consent to removal from state.

No person shall remove from the state of Wyoming any part of any such ruins or deposit except with the consent of the state board of land commissioners. Said board may require, as a condition to such consent, that such portion of such relics, materials, or deposit as said board shall require, shall forever remain the property of the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 37, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 24-132; W.S. 1957, § 36-12.

§ 36-1-116.
Protection of prehistoric ruins; penalty.

Except as provided by subsection (d) of this section, any person violating any of the provisions of this act shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) or more than one hundred dollars ($100.00), or imprisoned in the county jail not more than six (6) months, or by both fine and imprisonment, and shall forfeit to the state all articles and materials discovered by or through his efforts.

Persons holding permits or leases on state lands may not sublease or subcontract archeological or paleontological removal without prior written approval of the board.

All state leases are subject to inspection by state or county law enforcement agencies or their designees for violation of W.S.

36-1-114

and

36-1-115

.

Any person who, for monetary gain or for commercial or any other purpose, removes any archeological or paleontological artifacts in violation of W.S.

36-1-114

or

36-1-115

with a cumulative value in excess of five hundred ($500.00), shall be guilty of a felony and upon conviction shall be fined up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), imprisoned for up to ten (10) years, or both.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 37, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 24-133; W.S. 1957, § 36-13; 1997, ch. 200, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act” as used in this section, see § 36-1-101(a)(viii).

§ 36-1-117.
Sale or trade of state lands; hearing upon request of county commissioners.

No sale or trade of any state land including state land currently held by the state of Wyoming shall be made without a public hearing in the county in which the land is located if a hearing is requested by the county commissioners.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 53, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

Prior to 1987, this section had been set out as an uncodified editor's note following §

36-12-109

.

§ 36-1-118.
Sale of experimental farms and stations.

The board of trustees of the University of Wyoming is authorized and empowered on behalf of the state to sell and to execute any document of title necessary to convey title to any agricultural experimental farm or station in Uinta county, in Laramie county and if in existence before January 1, 2003, in Goshen county, title to which is held in the name of the state of Wyoming, provided:

The sale is made for adequate consideration and complies with all statutory requirements;

Proceeds of the sale shall be credited to the University of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 181, § 1; 2003, ch. 147, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 36-1-119.
Posting notice of restrictions to public lands; restrictions; penalties.

No person shall post a notice on any public land or on a public road as defined by W.S. 24-1-133(b) restricting access to public lands unless the restriction has been approved by the governing body having jurisdiction over the public land.

For purposes of this section “public land” means any land under the jurisdiction of the board of land commissioners or under the jurisdiction of any political subdivision of the state which the public is authorized to use without obtaining legal permission from a private landowner.

The governing body or its authorized representative having jurisdiction over the public land shall issue a written demand to any person who unlawfully posts a notice in violation of subsection (a) of this section directing that the notice be removed within three (3) days following receipt of the notice. The demand shall be delivered in person by a peace officer or mailed by both first class mail and certified mail return receipt requested to the person’s last known mailing address. Any person who knowingly posts an illegal notice or who fails to remove an illegal notice within three (3) days after receiving the demand from the governing body is guilty of a misdemeanor. If the person cannot be personally served because he deliberately made himself unavailable for service, or refused to accept delivery of the demand by certified mail, then he shall be guilty of a misdemeanor if he fails to remove the illegal notice within five (5) days after the demand was mailed to him by the governing body. Any person convicted of a misdemeanor under this section shall be punished by a fine up to six hundred dollars ($600.00) for each day the person fails to remove the illegal notice. For a second or subsequent offense, the penalty shall be a fine of not more than six hundred dollars ($600.00) per day, and up to six (6) months in jail, or both.

It shall be a defense to any charge under this section, that severe weather or other circumstance not within control of the person charged prevented removal of the notice.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 13, § 1.

§ 36-1-120.
Posting of public access to state lands; signage.

The office of state lands and investments shall supervise the placement of signs on state lands readily identifiable by the office, using trained volunteers. The signs shall indicate that the land is administered by the board of land commissioners.

The signage shall be placed:

On identifiable state land that has legal access;

To reasonably identify state land that is adjacent to, or contiguous with, private land and which is accessible to the public for hunting, fishing or recreation.

The signage shall include notice that:

Motorized vehicles shall be confined to established roads; and

Use of the state land is subject to board of land commissioners’ rules.

For purposes of this section, “state land” means any land under the jurisdiction of the board of land commissioners, which the public is authorized to use without obtaining legal permission from a private landowner.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 169, § 1.

§ 36-1-121.
Conservation easements.

Except for any conservation easement received or accepted by the board before the effective date of this act [§§

36-1-101

through

36-1-121

], the board shall not accept or receive any conservation easement pursuant to W.S.

34-1-202

.

Except for any conservation easement received or accepted by the board before the effective date of this act, the board shall not be considered a “holder” pursuant to W.S. 34-1-201(b)(ii)(A).

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 26, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2008, ch. 26, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2008.

Articles 2 and 3. [Reserved]